District of Columbia statutes.
22-3752

Enumerated offenses.

The provisions of §§ 22-3751 and 22-3751.01 shall apply to the following offenses or any attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the following offenses: murder, manslaughter, aggravated assault, assault with a dangerous weapon, mayhem or maliciously disfiguring, threats to do bodily harm, first degree sexual abuse, second degree sexual abuse, third degree sexual abuse, fourth degree sexual abuse, misdemeanor sexual abuse, robbery, carjacking, and kidnapping.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-307, § 3, 48 DCR 600
July 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-206, § 2(c), 55 DCR 5168
D.C. Law 17-206 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “The provisions of § 22-3751 shall apply to the following offenses: taking property from another by force or by threat of force, murder, attempted murder, first degree sexual abuse, second degree sexual abuse, attempted rape, carjacking, kidnapping, robbery, attempted robbery, assault with a dangerous weapon, and aggravated assault.”
This section is referenced in § 22-3751 and § 22-3751.01.